Arkansas, session 2025, SB565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-249(b)(2), concerning reporting
requirement for purchases made under a cooperative purchasing agreement under
the Arkansas Procurement Law, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The reports required under this subsection shall be
submitted by July October 1 in the format required by the Legislative Council
*JLL302*
04-01-2025 15:06:21 JLL302

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB565
and shall include the following:
(A) The name of the contractor;
(B) The name of the procuring agency;
(C) The contact information for the contractor and
procuring agency;
(D) The total cost of the contract, including all
available extensions;
(E) A description of the public school construction
services, goods, or other services procured; and
(F) Any other information requested by the Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11, Subchapter 2, is amended to
add an additional section to read as follows:
19-11-282. Combined written certification.
(a) When a contractor certifies in a contract with a state agency that
the contractor shall comply with all Arkansas laws applicable to the
contractor’s performance under the contract, the certification provided in
the contract shall serve as a combined written certification that the
contractor certifies and warrants by operation of law that the contractor:
(1) Does not and shall not employ an illegal immigrant or use a
subcontractor that employs or contracts with an illegal immigrant in
violation of § 19-11-105;
(2) Has not been retained and has not retained a person to
solicit or secure a state contract on an agreement or understanding for a
commission, percentage, brokerage, or contingent fee, except for retention of
the contractor’s bona fide employees or bona fide established commercial
selling agencies maintained by the contractor for the purpose of securing
business in violation of § 19-11-708;
(3) Under penalty of perjury and to the best of the contractor’s
knowledge and belief is not providing a regular full-time or part-time
employee of a state agency with a personal, direct, or indirect monetary
benefit as a result of the execution of the contract in violation of § 19-11-
1012(b)(8);
(4) Understands that, if the state fails to appropriate funds or
make moneys available for a biennial period covered by the term of the
04-01-2025 15:06:21 JLL302

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB565
contract for the services to be provided by the contractor, the contract
shall be terminated on the last day of the last biennial period for which
funds were appropriated or moneys made available for such purposes, as
provided in § 19-11-1012(b)(11);
(5) If applicable, is not currently engaged in and agrees for
the duration of the contract not to engage in a boycott of Israel or a
boycott of energy, fossil fuel, firearms, and ammunition industries in
violation of §§ 25-1-503 and 25-1-1102;
(6) Is not owned in whole or with a majority ownership by the
government of the People's Republic of China and is not subcontracting with a
scrutinized company as defined in § 25-1-1202 in violation of § 25-1-1203;
and
(7) Shall in all other respects comply with the laws, rules, and
executive orders of the state that apply to the contractor’s performance
under the contract.
(b)(1) A combined written certification under this section is a
single, universal, and supervening certification that shall be accepted in
lieu of the specific, individual certifications otherwise required by
Arkansas law.
(2) A state agency may rely on a combined written certification
under this section and the implicit certifications and warranties the
combined written certification supplies by operation of law in satisfaction
of and as an alternative to obtaining the individual specific certifications
otherwise required under Arkansas law, including without limitation under §§
19-11-105, 19-11-708, 19-11-1012, 25-1-503, 25-1-1102, and 25-1-1202.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-11-708(c), concerning the prohibition
against contingent fees with respect to state contracts, is amended to read
as follows:
(c) Notice. The representation prescribed in subsection (b) of this
section shall be conspicuously set forth in all contracts and solicitations
therefor for commodities or services, or both, if payment is expected to be
at least seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

/s/Flippo

04-01-2025 15:06:21 JLL302